District of Columbia statutes.
50-1541.17

Effect of missing or incorrect information.

Except as otherwise provided in § 28:9-337, a certificate of title or other record required or authorized by this chapter is effective even if it contains incorrect information or does not contain required information.

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-215, § 18, 61 DCR 13083
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.